Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-615
Petty cash fund; authorized.

The State Treasurer may establish a petty cash fund of not to exceed one thousand dollars for the purpose of cashing checks for state senators and state employees. The type of checks and the maximum amount for which such checks may be written shall be prescribed by the State Treasurer. Proof of state employment may be required prior to cashing a check.

Laws 1986, LB 599, § 1.